Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 13. Transfer of water

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 38, § 1, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2009.

§ 41-2-1301.
Transfer of water authorized; conditions.

Pursuant to W.S.

41-3-115

, the United States Bureau of Reclamation and the Wyoming water development office are hereby authorized to transfer a maximum of thirty-three thousand four hundred ninety-three (33,493) acre feet of storage water per year from the environmental account in the Pathfinder Modification Project within Pathfinder reservoir to the Wyoming-Nebraska state line for the purpose of providing regulatory certainty under the Endangered Species Act for the use of Wyoming water in the Platte River basin.

Pursuant to W.S.

41-3-115

, and the Wyoming water development office is hereby authorized to transfer a maximum of nine thousand six hundred (9,600) acre feet of storage water per year from the Wyoming account in the Pathfinder Modification Project within Pathfinder reservoir to the Wyoming-Nebraska state line through annual temporary water use agreements with the Platte River Recovery Implementation Program in any year the storage water in the Wyoming account is not needed by the state of Wyoming as a municipal water supply or a replacement water supply to meet the state of Wyoming’s obligations in the Nebraska v. Wyoming settlement agreement and the Platte River Recovery Implementation Program.

The authorizations granted under subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall terminate if the state of Wyoming withdraws from the Platte River Recovery Implementation Program or any successor programs approved by the governor.

If the director of the Wyoming water development office determines that Wyoming water users are not receiving the regulatory certainty under the endangered species act as provided for in the Platte River recovery implementation program, he shall submit a report to the select water committee outlining the inadequacy of the regulatory certainty.

If the state engineer determines that the transfers authorized under subsections (a) and (b) of this section cause injury to Wyoming water users beyond those identified in the final opinion and recommendations provided to the legislature pursuant to W.S. 41-3-115(q), then the state engineer shall report the injury to the select water committee.

Any revenue generated through the annual temporary water use agreements for storage water from the Wyoming account shall be deposited in the account created by W.S. 41-2-1001(a)(iv).

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 38, § 1.